en: natural oat flavouring
fr: arôme naturel d'avoine

en: nature identical flavouring
hr: prirodno identična aroma
it: aroma identico alla natura

en: artificial flavouring, artificial flavour, artificial flavor, artificial flavoring
bg: изкуствен аромат, изкуствен ароматизант
cs: Umělá příchuť
da: kunstig smag
de: künstliches Aroma
es: aroma artificial, saborizante artificial, sabor artificial, saborizantes artificiales
fi: keinotekoinen aromi, keinotekoiset aromit
fr: arôme artificiel, arômes artificiels
hr: umjetna aroma
hu: mesterséges aroma, mesterséges aromák
it: Aroma artificiale
ko: 합성향료
nl: Kunstmatige smaakstoffen
pl: Sztuczny aromat, sztuczne aromaty
pt: Aromatizante artificial
ro: Arome artificiale, aromă artificială
ru: Искусственный ароматизатор
th: แต่งกลิ่นสังเคราะห์

en: barbecue flavouring
de: Grillaroma
es: aroma a barbacoa
fr: base aromatisante barbecue
hr: aroma za roštilj
it: aroma barbecue
pl: aromat barbecue

en: biscuit flavouring
hr: aromakeksa
it: aroma di biscotti

en: meat flavour
de: Fleischgeschmack, Fleischaroma
es: aroma de carne
fr: Arôme de viande
hr: okus mesa
it: sapore di carne
pl: aromat mięsny, aromat mięsa

en: natural and artificial flavouring, natural and artificial flavours, natural and artificial flavors, natural and artificial flavoring
bg: натурален и изкуствен ароматизант
cs: Přírodní a umělá příchuť
da: naturlige og kunstige aromaer
de: natürliches und künstliches Aroma
es: Aroma natural y artificial, saborizante artificial y natural
fi: luontaiset ja keinotekoiset aromit
fr: arômes naturels et artificiels
hr: prirodne i umjetne arome
hu: természetes és mesterséges aromák
it: Aroma naturale ed artificiale
nl: Natuurlijke en kunstmatige smaakstoffen
pl: Naturalne i sztuczne aromaty

en: with other natural flavouring, other natural flavours
de: mit anderen natürlichen Aromen, andere natürliche Aromen
es: con otros aromas naturales
fi: muut luontaiset aromit
fr: avec autres arômes naturels, autres arômes naturels
hr: sa ostalim prirodnim aromama, prirodno identične
is: með öðrum náttúrulegum bragðefnum
it: con altri aromi naturali
nl: Met andere natuurlijke smaakstoffen
pl: z innymi naturalnymi aromatami
ru: ароматизатор идентичный натуральному

en: natural dill flavouring
da: naturlig dildaroma
de: natürliches Dill-Aroma, natürliches Dillaroma
fr: arôme naturel d'aneth
hr: prirodna aroma kopra
it: aroma naturale di aneto
sv: naturlig dillarom

en: chicken flavouring
da: kyllingearoma
de: Hühnergewürz, Hühnerfleischaroma, Hühnerfleisch-Aroma, Hühnerfleischextrakt
es: Sabor a pollo, sabor pollo
fi: kana-aromi
fr: arôme de poulet, arôme de poule
hr: aroma za piletinu
it: Aroma di pollo
pl: aromat kurczaka
ro: aromă de pui, aroma de pui
sv: kycklingarom

en: nature-identical chicken flavour
es: sabor idéntico al natural pollo
hr: prirodno identičan okus piletine

fr: arômes naturels d'agrumes avec autres arômes naturels
da: naturlig citrusaroma med andre naturlige aromaer
de: natürliches Citrus Aroma mit anderen natürlichen Aromen
fi: luontainen sitrusaromi ja muut luontaiset aromit
hr: prirodna citrus aroma sa drugim prirodnim aromama
nl: natuurlijke aroma's van citrusvruchten met andere natuurlijke aroma's
nn: naturlig sitrusaroma med andre naturlige aromaer
sv: naturlig citrusarom med andra naturliga aromer

en: salt and vinegar flavour
de: Salz und Essig Geschmack
es: sabor a sal y vinagre
fr: saveur sel et vinaigre
hr: okus soli i octa
it: sale e aroma di aceto
pl: smak soli i octu

en: brandy flavouring
de: Brandy-Aroma
es: aroma de brandy
fr: arôme de brandy
hr: aroma rakije
it: aroma di brandy
pl: aromat brandy

en: chili pepper flavouring
da: chilipeppersmag
fi: chilipippuriaromi
nl: chilipepersmaak
sv: chilipepparsmak

en: sweet chili pepper flavouring
da: sød chilipeppersmag, sød chili-smag, sød chili smag
fr: base aromatisante piment doux
sv: söt chilipepparsmak, söt chili-smak

en: maple flavouring
fr: arôme d'érable
hr: aroma javora
it: aroma di acero

en: natural maple flavouring
fr: arôme naturel d'érable
hr: prirodna aroma javora
it: aroma naturale d'acero

en: maple extract
fr: extrait d'érable
hr: ekstrakt javora
it: estratto d'acero, estratto di acero

en: natural maple extract
fr: extrait naturel d'érable
hr: prirodni ekstrakt javora
it: estratto naturale di acero